Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF901.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 80B.11D, subsections 1 and 3, Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: 1. An individual who is not a certified law enforcement officer may apply for attendance at a short course of study at an approved law enforcement level II academy training program if such individual is sponsored by a law enforcement agency. Such individual may be sponsored if the individual has been hired by a law enforcement agency that either or a law enforcement agency intends to hire or has hired the individual as a law enforcement officer. 3. An individual who submits an application pursuant to subsection 1 shall, at a minimum, submit proof of successful completion of a two-year or four-year police science or criminal justice program at an accredited educational institution in this state approved by the academy , and meet the qualifications set forth in section 80B.11H, subsections 1 and 3 . Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 80B.11H Military veterans with active duty military police experience ââ former federal law enforcement officers. House File 901, p. 2 1. A veteran may qualify for reciprocity in this state without completing the level I academy training program if the veteran meets the following criteria: a. Has served a minimum of four years of active duty in the United States armed forces. b. Has served in a primary military occupational specialty or equivalent designation as a military police officer in the army, or its equivalent in other branches, within three years of submitting an application for reciprocity. c. Has successfully completed accredited military police training equivalent to or exceeding the academyâs standards. d. Has received an honorable discharge or is still actively serving. 2. An eligible veteran shall submit an application to the council for evaluation. The application shall include all of the following: a. Proof of military service and discharge status. b. Certification of military police training and experience. c. Documentation of relevant duties performed during active duty. 3. A federal law enforcement officer may qualify for reciprocity in this state without completing the level I academy training program if the federal law enforcement officer meets all of the following criteria: a. Has served a minimum of four years as a federal law enforcement officer within three years of submitting an application for reciprocity. b. Has successfully completed accredited federal law enforcement training equivalent to or exceeding the academyâs standards. 4. The council shall review the applications and approve qualified applicants for entry into the reciprocity program. If an applicant is not approved for the reciprocity program, the council may consider the applicant for entry into a level II academy training program under section 80B.11D. 5. The council shall develop procedures and guidelines for evaluating military police training and equivalency standards. 6. The council shall publish an annual report including data on the number of veterans and federal law enforcement officers House File 901, p. 3 certified through the reciprocity program and the current certification status of those going through the program. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 901, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor